incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="amadá/n__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iara/nn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/á__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aethanta</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aethanta</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aethanta</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aethanta</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="foca/l__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bro/c__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ic</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pu/nt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nta</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cas/adh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aidh</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aidh</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taí</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taí</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taí</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taí</l>
          <r>adh<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="amadán"><par n="a_init"/><i>madá</i><par n="amadá/n__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iarann"><par n="i_init"/><i>ara</i><par n="iara/nn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lá"><i>l</i><par n="l/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="broc"><par n="b_init"/><i>ro</i><par n="bro/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punt"><par n="p_init"/><i>u</i><par n="pu/nt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="casadh"><par n="c_init"/><i>as</i><par n="cas/adh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerthaisteal"><par n="a_init"/><i>erthaistea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aireagal"><par n="a_init"/><i>ireaga</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aitheascal"><par n="a_init"/><i>itheasca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anamcheol"><par n="a_init"/><i>namcheo</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athfhriotal"><par n="a_init"/><i>thfhriota</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baol"><par n="b_init"/><i>ao</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beibheal"><par n="b_init"/><i>eibhea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bíomal"><par n="b_init"/><i>íoma</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buiséal"><par n="b_init"/><i>uiséa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caidéal"><par n="c_init"/><i>aidéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cairéal"><par n="c_init"/><i>airéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="camleithscéal"><par n="c_init"/><i>amleithscéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caramal"><par n="c_init"/><i>arama</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="casal"><par n="c_init"/><i>asa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceangal"><par n="c_init"/><i>eanga</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cineál"><par n="c_init"/><i>ineá</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciseal"><par n="c_init"/><i>isea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clásal"><par n="c_init"/><i>lása</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cogal"><par n="c_init"/><i>oga</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coiréal"><par n="c_init"/><i>oiréa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhal"><par n="c_init"/><i>omha</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhshaol"><par n="c_init"/><i>omhshao</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="criól"><par n="c_init"/><i>rió</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuideal"><par n="c_init"/><i>uidea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diúl"><par n="d_init"/><i>iú</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dual"><par n="d_init"/><i>ua</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáthscéal"><par n="f_init"/><i>áthscéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foirceadal"><par n="f_init"/><i>oirceada</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gael"><par n="g_init"/><i>ae</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geal"><par n="g_init"/><i>ea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnáthphobal"><par n="g_init"/><i>náthphoba</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="habal"><i>haba</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iúl"><i>iú</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leathshaol"><i>leathshao</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mál"><par n="m_init"/><i>á</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meánchiorcal"><par n="m_init"/><i>eánchiorca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modal"><par n="m_init"/><i>oda</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mórshiúl"><par n="m_init"/><i>órshiú</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuachtspól"><i>nuachtspó</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parabal"><par n="p_init"/><i>araba</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peitreal"><par n="p_init"/><i>eitrea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prionsabal"><par n="p_init"/><i>rionsaba</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rastal"><i>rasta</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rúbal"><i>rúba</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sciorrfhocal"><par n="s_init"/><i>ciorrfhoca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seansaol"><par n="s_init"/><i>eansao</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siúl"><par n="s_init"/><i>iú</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sofhriotal"><par n="s_init"/><i>ofhriota</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sraithscéal"><par n="s_init"/><i>raithscéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strufal"><par n="s_init"/><i>trufa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teideal"><par n="t_init"/><i>eidea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tréithchineál"><par n="t_init"/><i>réithchineá</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuiseal"><par n="t_init"/><i>uisea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
